Georgia statutes. TITLE 35 Law Enforcement Officers and Agencies
Article 6A DNA Sampling, Collection, and Analysis

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section

28-9-3

, in 2011, the amendment of this article by Ga. L. 2011,
p. 99, § 50/HB 24, was treated as repealed and superseded by Ga. L. 2011, p.
264, § 3-1/SB 80, due to irreconcilable conflict. See County of Butts v. Strahan,

151 Ga. 417

(1921); Keener v. McDougall,

232 Ga. 273

(1974).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 264, § 1-1/SB 80, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Johnia Berry Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2011, p. 264, § 3-1/SB 80, effective January 1, 2013, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this article and enacted the current article.
The former article consisted of Code Sections

35-3-160

through

35-3-165

, relating to DNA analysis upon conviction of certain sex offenses, and was based on Code 1981, §§ 24-4-60 — 24-4-65, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2034, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1075, §§ 1-5; Ga. L. 2004, p. 485, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 24/HB 95; Ga. L. 2007, p. 408, § 1/HB 314; Ga. L. 2008, p. 252, § 1/SB 430; Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 50/HB 24; Code 1981, §§

35-3-160

—

35-3-165

, as redesignated by Ga. L.
2011, p. 264, § 2-1/SB 80.

Law reviews.

For comment, “DNA Collection Acts and the Fourth Amendment: A Call for Legislative Reform in Georgia to Implement Collection of Arrestees’ DNA,” see 32 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 513 (2016).

For article, “From the Crime Scene to the Courtroom:
The Future of Forensic Science Reform:
The First Amendment Case for Public Access to Secret Algorithms Used in Criminal Trials,”
see 34 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 915 (2018).

For article, “From the Crime Scene to the Courtroom:
The Future of Forensic Science Reform:
Three Transformative Ideals to Build a Better Crime Lab,” see 34 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1007 (2018).

For article, “From the Crime Scene to the Courtroom:
The Future of Forensic Science Reform:
Symposium Keynote Address:
Uncovering Forensic Laws:
An Outside Perspective,” see 34 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1221 (2018).

For note, “It’s All In The DNA—How

United States v. Hano

Extends the Statute Of Limitations for the Eleventh Circuit,” see 71 Mercer L. Rev. 1191 (2020).

35-3-160.
DNA analysis in felony convictions and certain felony charges; performance of tests.

As used in this article, the term:

“Department” means the Department of Corrections.

“Detention facility” means a penal institution under the jurisdiction of the department, including penal institutions operated by a private company on behalf of the department, inmate work camps, inmate boot camps, probation detention centers, parole revocation centers, and county correctional facilities.

“Division” means the Division of Forensic Sciences of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation.

A sample of deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) shall be collected by oral swab or other noninvasive procedure from any individual:

Who has been convicted of a felony and is currently incarcerated in a detention facility, serving a probation sentence, or serving under the jurisdiction of the State Board of Pardons and Paroles for such felony; or

Who has been charged with a felony, and sentence for such offense has been imposed pursuant to Article 3 of Chapter 8 of Title 42 or pursuant to subsection (a) or (c) of Code Section 16-13-2.

Unless a DNA sample has already been collected by the department or another agency or entity, each DNA sample required by paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be collected by the detention facility which is detaining or the entity which is supervising such individual, and the sample shall be forwarded to the division.

Paragraph (1) of this subsection shall not apply to any individual for a conviction for a misdemeanor, to any individual who is charged with a misdemeanor and the sentence for such misdemeanor is imposed pursuant to Article 3 of Chapter 8 of Title 42 regarding first offenders, or because he or she has been charged with a misdemeanor.

DNA analysis shall be performed by the division. The division shall be authorized to contract with individuals or organizations for services to perform such analysis. The identifying characteristics of the profile resulting from the DNA analysis shall be stored and maintained by the bureau in a DNA data bank in accordance with Code Sections 35-3-162 and 35-3-163 and shall be made available only as provided in Code Section 35-3-163.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-160

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 264, § 3-1/SB 80; Ga. L. 2019, p. 299, § 1/HB 470.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 28, 2019, deleted former paragraph (a)(2), which read: “ ‘Division’ means the Division of Forensic Sciences of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation.”; redesignated former paragraph (a)(3) as present paragraph (a)(2); substituted the present provisions of paragraph (a)(2) for the former provisions, which read: “Detention facility” means a penal institution under the jurisdiction of the department used for the detention of persons convicted of a felony, including penal institutions operated by a private company on behalf of the department, inmate work camps, inmate boot camps, probation detention centers, and parole revocation centers. Such term shall also mean any facility operated under the jurisdiction of a sheriff used for the detention of persons convicted of a felony including a county jail or county correctional facility.”; added paragraph (a)(3); substituted the present provisions of subsection (b) for the former provisions, which read: “Any person convicted of a felony offense who is held in a detention facility or placed on probation shall at the time of entering the detention facility or being placed on probation have a sample of his or her blood, an oral swab, or a sample obtained from a noninvasive procedure taken for DNA (deoxyribonucleic acid) analysis to determine identification characteristics specific to the person. The provisions and requirements of this Code section shall also apply to any person who has been convicted of a felony prior to July 1, 2011, and who currently is incarcerated in a detention facility, serving a probation sentence, or serving under the jurisdiction of the Board of Pardons and Paroles for such offense. It shall be the responsibility of the detention facility detaining or entity supervising a convicted felon to collect the samples required by this Code section and forward the sample to the division unless such sample has already been collected by the department or another agency or entity.”; and, in subsection (c), substituted “DNA” for “The” at the beginning of the first sentence, in the third sentence, substituted “identifying” for “identification” near the beginning and inserted “in accordance with Code Sections 35-3-162 and 35-3-163” near the end.

Editor’s notes.

The catchline for this Code section is set out above to better reflect the statutory provisions.

Law reviews.

For note, “Padgett v. Donald: Why Not So Special,” see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 673 (2006).

For article, “Evidence,” see 27 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2011).

35-3-161.
Time and procedure for withdrawal of blood samples.

Each sample required pursuant to Code Section 35-3-160 from persons who are to be incarcerated shall be withdrawn within the first 30 days of incarceration at the receiving unit of the detention facility or at such other place as is designated by the department. Each sample required pursuant to Code Section 35-3-160 from persons who are to be released from a detention facility shall be withdrawn within the 12 months preceding such person’s release at a place designated by the department. The required samples from persons who are not sentenced to a term of confinement shall be withdrawn as a condition of probation. The division shall publish in its quality manuals the procedures for the collection and transfer of samples to such division pursuant to Code Section 35-3-154. Personnel at a detention facility shall implement the provisions of this Code section as part of the regular processing of offenders.

Samples collected by oral swab or by a noninvasive procedure may be collected by any individual who has been trained in the procedure. Only a correctional health nurse technician, physician, registered professional nurse, licensed practical nurse, graduate laboratory technician, or phlebotomist shall withdraw any sample of blood to be submitted for analysis. No civil liability shall attach to any person authorized to take a sample as provided in this article as a result of the act of taking a sample from any person submitting thereto, provided the sample was taken according to recognized medically accepted procedures. However, no person shall be relieved from liability for negligence in the withdrawing of any blood sample.

Chemically clean sterile disposable needles shall be used for the withdrawal of all samples of blood. The containers for blood samples, oral swabs, and the samples obtained by noninvasive procedures shall be sealed and labeled with the subject’s name, social security number, date of birth, race, and gender plus the name of the person collecting the sample and the date and place of collection. The containers shall be secured to prevent tampering with the contents. The steps set forth in this subsection relating to the taking, handling, identification, and disposition of samples are procedural and not substantive. Substantial compliance therewith shall be deemed to be sufficient. The samples shall be transported to the division not more than 15 days following withdrawal and shall be analyzed and stored in the DNA data bank in accordance with Code Sections 35-3-162 and 35-3-163.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-161

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 264, § 3-1/SB 80.

35-3-162.
Procedure for analysis and storage of blood sample; use of remainder of sample not subjected to analysis; confidentiality of results.

Whether or not the results of an analysis are to be included in the data bank, the bureau shall conduct the DNA analysis in accordance with procedures adopted by the bureau to determine identification characteristics specific to the individual whose sample is being analyzed. The director or his or her designated representative shall complete and maintain on file a form indicating the name of the person whose sample is to be analyzed, the date and by whom the sample was received and examined, and a statement that the seal on the container containing the sample had not been broken or otherwise tampered with. The remainder of a sample submitted for analysis and inclusion in the data bank pursuant to Code Section 35-3-160 may be divided, if possible, labeled as provided for the original sample, and securely stored by the bureau in accordance with specific procedures of the bureau to ensure the integrity and confidentiality of the samples. All or part of the remainder of that sample may be used only to create a statistical data base provided no identifying information on the individual whose sample is being analyzed is included or for retesting by the bureau to validate or update the original analysis. A report of the results of a DNA analysis conducted by the bureau as authorized, including the identifying information, shall be made and maintained at the bureau. Except as specifically provided in this Code section and Code Section 35-3-163, the results of the analysis shall be securely stored and shall remain confidential.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-162

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 264, § 3-1/SB 80.

35-3-163.
Dissemination of information in data bank to law enforcement officials; comparison of profile; request for search; separate statistical data base authorized; fee for search and comparative analysis.

It shall be the duty of the bureau to receive samples and to analyze, classify, and file the results of DNA identification characteristics of samples submitted pursuant to Code Section 35-3-160 and to make such information available as provided in this Code section. The results of an analysis and comparison of the identification of the characteristics from two or more biological samples shall be made available directly to federal, state, and local law enforcement officers upon a request made in furtherance of an official investigation of any criminal offense. A request may be made by personal contact, mail, or electronic means. The name of the requestor and the purpose for which the information is requested shall be maintained on file with the bureau.

Upon request from a prosecuting attorney or law enforcement agency, the bureau may compare a DNA profile from an analysis of a sample from a suspect in a criminal investigation when the sample was obtained through a search warrant, consent of the suspect, court order, or other lawful means to DNA profiles lawfully collected and maintained by the bureau. The bureau shall not add a DNA profile of any such suspect to any DNA data bank except as provided in this article.

Upon his or her request, a copy of the request for search shall be furnished to any individual identified and charged with an offense as the result of a search of information in the data bank. Only when a sample or DNA profile supplied by the requestor satisfactorily matches the requestor’s profile in the data bank shall the existence of data in the data bank be confirmed or identifying information from the data bank be disseminated.

The name of the individual whose profile is contained in the data bank may be related to any other data bases which are constructed for law enforcement purposes and may be disseminated only for law enforcement purposes.

Upon a showing by the accused in a criminal proceeding that access to the DNA data bank is material to the investigation, preparation, or presentation of a defense at trial or in a posttrial proceeding, a superior court having proper jurisdiction over such criminal proceeding shall direct the bureau to compare the DNA profile which has been generated by the accused through an independent test against the data bank, provided that such DNA profile has been generated in accordance with standards for forensic DNA analysis adopted pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Section 14131.

The bureau shall develop procedures governing the methods of obtaining information from the data bank in accordance with this Code section and procedures for verification of the identity and authority of the requestor. The bureau shall specify the positions in that agency which require regular access to the data bank and samples submitted as a necessary function of the job.

The bureau may create a separate statistical data base composed of DNA profiles of samples of persons whose identity is unknown. Nothing in this Code section or Code Section 35-3-164 shall prohibit the bureau from sharing or otherwise disseminating the information in the statistical data base with law enforcement or criminal justice agencies within or outside the state.

The bureau may charge a reasonable fee to search and provide a comparative analysis of DNA profiles in the data bank to any authorized law enforcement agency outside of this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-163

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 264, § 3-1/SB 80; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 35/HB 79; Ga. L. 2019, p. 299, § 2/HB 470.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 28, 2019, in subsection (b), in the first sentence, substituted “prosecuting attorney” for “prosecutor” near the beginning and substituted “when” for “where” in the middle, and deleted “upon conviction” following “except” near the end of the second sentence; substituted “individual” for “person” in the middle of the first sentence in paragraph (c)(1); substituted “individual” for “convicted felon” near the beginning of paragraph (c)(2); and, in the middle of paragraph (c)(3), substituted “posttrial” for “postconviction” and substituted “the DNA profile” for “a DNA profile”.

U.S. Code.

The reference to 42 U.S.C. Section 14131, in this Code section, refers to provisions on quality assurance and proficiency testing standards for forensic DNA.

Law reviews.

For note, “A Modern Day Arthur Dimmesdale:
Public Notification When Sex Offenders Are Released into the Community,” see 12 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1187 (1995).

For note, “Padgett v. Donald: Why Not So Special,” see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 673 (2006).

35-3-164.
Unlawful dissemination or use of information; obtaining sample without authority.

Any person who, without authority, disseminates information contained in the data bank shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Any person who disseminates, receives, or otherwise uses or attempts to so use information in the data bank, knowing that such dissemination, receipt, or use is for a purpose other than as authorized by law, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature.

Except for purposes of law enforcement or as authorized by this article, any person who, for purposes of having DNA analysis performed, obtains or attempts to obtain any sample submitted to the division for analysis shall be guilty of a felony.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-164

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 264, § 3-1/SB 80.

35-3-165.
Expungement of DNA profile in data bank; requirements.

The bureau shall purge all records and identifiable information in the data bank pertaining to the DNA profile of the individual and shall destroy all such DNA samples collected from such individual within 30 days of the receipt of a certified copy of the applicable:

Court order reversing the conviction together with a court order or documentation from the prosecuting attorney stating that the charges were dismissed;

Judgment of acquittal;

Sentencing order showing that all of the felony charges were reduced to misdemeanors; or

Court order showing the successful completion of the sentence that was imposed pursuant to Article 3 of Chapter 8 of Title 42 or pursuant to subsection (a) or (c) of Code Section 16-13-2.

A DNA sample obtained in good faith shall be deemed to have been obtained in accordance with the requirements of this article and its use in accordance with this article shall be authorized until it is expunged as set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-165

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 264, § 3-1/SB 80; Ga. L. 2019, p. 299, § 3/HB 470.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 28, 2019, substituted the present provisions of subsection (a) for the former provisions, which read: “A person whose DNA profile has been included in the data bank pursuant to this article may request that it be expunged on the grounds that the conviction on which the authority for including his or her DNA profile was based has been reversed and the case dismissed. The bureau shall purge all records and identifiable information in the data bank pertaining to the person and destroy all samples from the person upon receipt of a written request that such data be expunged, pursuant to this Code section, and a certified copy of the court order reversing and dismissing the conviction.”; and substituted “shall be authorized until it is expunged as set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section” for “is authorized until a court order directing expungement is obtained and submitted to the bureau” in the middle of subsection (b).